sl-SI: Stil pripomočka za vadbo rok: Digitalni pripomoček za krepitev oprijema; Raztezni trak; Vadbeni pripomoček za prste (neodvisna napetost); Obroč za prste; Pripomoček za krepitev oprijema (z vzmetjo); Žiroskopska žoga; Ročni valjček; Protistresna/terapevtska žoga; Terapevtski plastelin; Drugo
ko: 손 운동기구 스타일: 디지털 악력기; 익스텐션 밴드; 손가락 운동기(독립 텐션); 핑거 링; 악력기(스프링 그립); 자이로볼; 핸드 롤러; 스트레스/테라피 볼; 테라피 퍼티; 기타
cs: Styl posilovače zápěstí: Digitální posilovač úchopu; Extenzní guma; Posilovač prstů (nezávislý odpor); Posilovací kroužek na prsty; Posilovač úchopu (pružinový); Gyroskopická koule; Masážní váleček na ruce; Antistresový/terapeutický míček; Terapeutická hmota; Jiný
ro-RO: Stilul exercițiilor pentru mâini: Flexor digital pentru mână; Bandă de extensie; Dispozitiv pentru degete (tensiune independentă); Inel pentru degete; Flexor pentru mână (cu arc); Minge giroscopică; Rolă pentru mâini; Minge antistres/de terapie; Chit de terapie; Altele
nl: Handtrainer stijl: Digitale handknijper; Rekband; Vingertrainer (onafhankelijke spanning); Vingerring; Handknijper (veerknijper); Gyro-bal; Handroller; Stress-/therapiebal; Therapie-kneedgum; Overig
zh-TW: 手部訓練器樣式: 數位握力器; 伸展帶; 手指訓練器 (獨立張力); 握力圈; 握力器 (彈簧款); 腕力球; 手部滾輪; 紓壓/復健球; 復健黏土; 其他
ru: Тип тренажера для кистей: Цифровой кистевой эспандер; Лента для разгибания; Тренажер для пальцев (независимое натяжение); Кольцевой эспандер; Кистевой эспандер (пружинный); Гироскопический тренажер; Массажный валик для рук; Мяч-антистресс/терапевтический; Терапевтический пластилин; Другое
fi: Käsien voimaharjoittelulaitteen tyyppi: Digitaalinen puristusvoiman harjoituslaite; Sormien ojentajakuminauha; Sormivahvistin (erilliset jouset); Puristusrengas; Puristusvoiman harjoituslaite (jousipuristin); Gyropallo; Käsihierontarulla; Stressi-/terapiapallo; Terapiavaha; Muu
ja: ハンドエクササイザースタイル: デジタルハンドグリップ; エクステンションバンド; フィンガーエクササイザー (独立テンション); フィンガーリング; ハンドグリップ (スプリンググリッパー); ジャイロボール; ハンドローラー; ストレス/セラピーボール; セラピーパテ; その他
hu: Kézizom-edző típus: Digitális marokerősítő; Feszítőszalag; Ujjerősítő (független ellenállású); Ujjerősítő gyűrű; Marokerősítő (rugós); Giroszkópos labda; Kézi görgő; Stressz- / terápiás labda; Terápiás gyurma; Egyéb
hr-HR: Stil sprave za vježbanje ruku: Digitalni jačač stiska; Traka za rastezanje; Vježbač prstiju (neovisna napetost); Prsten za prste; Jačač stiska (opružni hvatač); Žiro-kugla; Ručni valjak; Antistresna/terapeutska loptica; Terapeutska masa; Ostalo
tr: El egzersiz cihazı stili: Dijital el yayı; Esneme bandı; Parmak egzersiz aleti (bağımsız direnç); Parmak yüzüğü; El yayı (yaylı sıkma); Jiroskopik top; El silindiri; Stres/terapi topu; Terapi hamuru; Diğer
nb: Håndtreningsstil: Digital grepsforsterker; Ekstensjonsbånd; Fingertrener (uavhengig motstand); Fingerring; Grepsforsterker (fjærgrep); Gyroball; Håndrulle; Stress-/terapiball; Terapikitt; Annet
sv: Handtränare – typ: Digital grepptränare; Fingerträningsband; Fingertränare (oberoende motstånd); Fingerring; Grepptränare (fjäder); Gyroboll; Handrulle; Stress-/terapiboll; Terapilera; Övrigt
pt-BR: Exercitador de mão estilo: Fortalecedor de punho digital; Faixa de extensão; Exercitador de dedos (tensão independente); Anel para dedos; Fortalecedor de punho (com mola); Gyro ball; Rolo massageador de mão; Bola antiestresse/terapêutica; Massa terapêutica; Outro
pt-PT: estilo exercitador de mãos: Fortalecedor de punho digital; Faixa de extensão; Exercitador de dedos (tensão independente); Argola para dedos; Fortalecedor de punho (mola); Bola giroscópica; Rolo de mão; Bola de stresse/terapia; Massa terapêutica; Outro
el: Στυλ οργάνου γυμναστικής χεριών: Ψηφιακός ενδυναμωτής λαβής; Λάστιχο έκτασης; Όργανο εξάσκησης δαχτύλων (ανεξάρτητης τάσης); Δακτύλιος δαχτύλων; Ενδυναμωτής λαβής (με ελατήριο); Μπάλα γυροσκόπιο; Ρολό χεριού; Μπάλα στρες/θεραπείας; Πλαστελίνη θεραπείας; Άλλο
es: Estilo de ejercitador para manos: Fortalecedor de agarre digital; Banda de extensión; Ejercitador de dedos (tensión independiente); Anillo para dedos; Fortalecedor de agarre (pinza de resorte); Pelota giroscópica; Rodillo para manos; Pelota antiestrés/terapéutica; Masilla terapéutica; Otro
pl: Styl przyrządu do ćwiczenia dłoni: Cyfrowy ściskacz do dłoni; Taśma do rozciągania palców; Trenażer palców (niezależny naciąg); Kółko do ćwiczeń dłoni; Ściskacz do dłoni (sprężynowy); Kula żyroskopowa; Roller do dłoni; Piłeczka antystresowa / rehabilitacyjna; Masa rehabilitacyjna; Inne
lt-LT: Rankų treniruoklio stilius: Skaitmeninis plaštakos treniruoklis; Tempimo juosta; Pirštų treniruoklis (nepriklausomas įtempimas); Žiedinis treniruoklis; Plaštakos treniruoklis (spyruoklinis); Giroskopinis kamuoliukas; Rankinis volelis; Streso / terapinis kamuoliukas; Terapinis plastilinas; Kita
bg-BG: Стил на ръчен тренажор: Дигитален уред за заздравяване на хвата; Еластична лента за разгъване; Уред за пръсти (независимо напрежение); Пръстен за пръсти; Уред за заздравяване на хвата (пружинен); Жироскопична топка; Ролер за ръце; Антистрес/терапевтична топка; Терапевтичен пластелин; Други
th: แบบอุปกรณ์บริหารมือ: ที่บีบมือวัดแรงบีบแบบดิจิทัล; ยางยืดบริหารนิ้ว; อุปกรณ์บริหารนิ้ว (แยกแรงต้านอิสระ); ห่วงยางบริหารนิ้ว; ที่บีบมือ (สปริง); ไจโรบอล; ลูกกลิ้งบริหารมือ; ลูกบอลบีบคลายเครียด/บำบัด; ดินน้ำมันบำบัด; อื่นๆ
da: Type af håndtræner: Digital håndtræner; Ekspansionsbånd; Fingertræner (uafhængig modstand); Fingerring; Håndtræner (fjedergreb); Gyrobold; Håndrulle; Stress-/terapibold; Træningsmasse; Andet
fr: Style d’appareil d’exercice pour la main: Pince de musculation numérique; Bande d’extension; Exerciseur de doigts (tension indépendante); Anneau de musculation; Pince de musculation (à ressort); Balle gyroscopique; Rouleau de massage pour les mains; Balle anti-stress/thérapeutique; Pâte thérapeutique; Autre
sk-SK: Typ posilňovača na ruky: Digitálny posilňovač úchopu; Naťahovacia páska; Posilňovač prstov (nezávislé napnutie); Krúžok na prsty; Posilňovač úchopu (pružinové kliešte); Gyroskopická loptička; Valček do ruky; Antistresová/terapeutická loptička; Terapeutická plastelína; Iné
zh-CN: 手部锻炼器款式: 数字握力计; 伸展带; 练指器（独立拉力）; 握力圈; 握力器（弹簧握力器）; 腕力球; 手部按摩滚轮; 解压/康复球; 康复胶泥; 其他
en: Hand exerciser style: Digital grip strengthener; Extension band; Finger exerciser (independent tension); Finger ring; Grip strengthener (spring gripper); Gyro ball; Hand roller; Stress/therapy ball; Therapy putty; Other
vi: Kiểu dụng cụ tập tay: Dụng cụ bóp tay kỹ thuật số; Dây kéo giãn; Dụng cụ tập ngón tay (lực căng độc lập); Vòng tập ngón tay; Dụng cụ bóp tay (kìm bóp tay); Bóng tập cổ tay; Con lăn tập tay; Bóng giảm xả stress/trị liệu; Đất nặn trị liệu; Khác
de: Stil des Handtrainers: Digitaler Griffkrafttrainer; Expander-Band; Fingertrainer (unabhängiger Widerstand); Fingerring; Griffkrafttrainer (Federgriff); Gyroball; Handroller; Stress-/Therapieball; Therapieknetmasse; Sonstige
it: Tipo di rinforzatore per le mani: Rafforzatore per la presa digitale; Fascia di estensione; Allenatore per dita (tensione indipendente); Anello per dita; Rafforzatore per la presa (a molla); Palla giroscopica; Rullo per mani; Pallina antistress/terapeutica; Pasta terapeutica; Altro